Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Certificates and Permits

281.615.
Permit for motor carrier required — Employment illegal, when. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 10; 1964, ch. 95, § 7; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.616.
Regulations concerning rendition of charter bus service. [Repealed.]

281.617.
Authority of person holding certificate for transportation of property to serve commercial areas of points authorized to be served. [Repealed.]

281.618.
Construction of certificates authorizing transportation of persons. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 139, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.6185.
Disabled persons vehicles — Requirements.

All disabled persons vehicles shall be in compliance with the provisions of 49 C.F.R. pt.38 and this chapter. A carrier operating under a disabled persons vehicle certificate may provide service to any person not requiring the use of the specialized equipment. A person requiring the use of specialized equipment may be accompanied by a companion.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 233, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 607, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 19, § 7, effective June 24, 2015.

281.619.
Nonprofit bus certificate. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 232, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 453, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.620.
Application for certificate, permit, or change therein — Fee. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 11; 1952, ch. 19, § 1; 1954, ch. 188, § 3; 1964, ch. 95, § 9; 1996, ch. 174, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 21, § 4, effective July 15, 2014; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.623.
Parcel delivery carriers — Certificates — Grandfather rights. [Repealed.]

281.624.
Household goods carriers — Administrative regulations.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements and to set forth standards for household goods carriers, including but not limited to the:

Determination of weights;

Establishment of rates for accessorial services;

Types of discounts prohibited;

Prohibition against a carrier acting as an agent for another carrier;

Insurance provisions;

Information required on a receipt or bill of lading;

Information required on a freight bill;

Liability of carriers;

Estimation of charges;

Absorption or advancement of dock charges;

Information for prospective shippers;

Minimum weight shipments; and

Filing of tariffs.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 108, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1974, ch. 167, § 1; 1996, ch. 318, § 193, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 331, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 19, § 8, effective June 24, 2015.

281.625.
Hearing on application — Notice — Protest — Exceptions. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 12; 1954, ch. 188, § 4; 1958, ch. 130, § 9; 1964, ch. 95, § 10; 1966, ch. 255, § 228; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 174, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 194, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 673, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 139, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 21, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.6251.
Notice of intention to apply for certificate. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 139, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 8, effective June 25, 2013; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.626.
U-Drive-It certificates.

Any person who operates as a U-Drive-It and rents vehicles for less than sixty (60) days shall obtain a U-Drive-It certificate prior to beginning operations. Any person who operates as a U-Drive-It and rents or leases vehicles for sixty (60) days or more may obtain a U-Drive-It certificate.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 14; 1958, ch. 130, § 10; 1990, ch. 466, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 195, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 19, § 9, effective June 24, 2015.

281.627.
Construction of certificates or permits authorizing transportation of petroleum and petroleum products in bulk in tank trucks. [Repealed.]

281.630.
Certificates issued by department — Applications — Fees — Renewal — Information to be filed — Agents of utility trailer lessor — Prohibition against employing services of unauthorized motor carrier — Powers of department relating to rates, services, and facilities — Hearings — Administrative regulations. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

A person shall not act as a motor carrier without first obtaining a certificate from the department.

A certificate for the intrastate transportation of passengers or property, including household goods, shall be issued to any qualified applicant authorizing operation covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant conforms to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements of the administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with this section.

The department shall issue the following certificates:

Taxicab certificate;

Limousine certificate;

Disabled persons vehicle certificate;

Transportation network company certificate;

Household goods certificate;

Charter bus certificate;

Bus certificate;

U-Drive-It certificate;

Property certificate;

Driveaway certificate; and

Automobile utility trailer certificate.

Application for a certificate shall be made in such form as the department may require. The department shall receive an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for all applications, except that the department shall receive an application fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for a property certificate.

Before the department may issue a certificate, an applicant shall:

Pay the application fee established under paragraph (b) of this subsection;

For entities other than TNCs, file a motor carrier vehicle license application for each motor carrier vehicle as required by KRS

281.631

. The applicant shall file at least one (1) motor carrier vehicle license application before being eligible for a certificate;

For TNCs, file a TNC authority application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

File with the department one (1) or more approved indemnifying bonds or insurance policies as required by KRS

281.655

;

For taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC, household goods, charter bus, and bus certificates, obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check, in compliance with KRS

281.6301

, of each owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent operating a passenger vehicle or household goods vehicle or entering a private residence or storage facility for the purpose of providing or facilitating the transportation of household goods;

For household goods certificates, file with the department a current tariff; and

For a bus certificate, file with the department authorization from a city as required by KRS 631.635.

Every certificate shall be renewed annually. Application for renewal shall be in such form as the department may require.

A certificate not renewed within one (1) calendar year after the date for its renewal shall become null and void.

The department shall not renew any certificate if it has been revoked or, if suspended, during the period of any suspension. A certificate shall not be considered revoked or suspended when an appeal of the revocation or suspension is pending in a court of competent jurisdiction.

For the renewal of an intrastate certificate, the department shall receive a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), except for an application for renewal of a property certificate, for which the department shall receive a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

Before the department may renew a certificate, the certificate holder shall:

Pay the renewal fee established under paragraph (d) of this subsection;

For the entities other than TNCs, file a motor carrier vehicle license application or renewal for each motor carrier vehicle as required by KRS

281.631

. The certificate holder shall file at least one (1) motor carrier vehicle license application or renewal before being eligible for renewal;

For TNCs, file a TNC authority application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

File with the department one (1) or more approved indemnifying bonds or insurance policies as required by KRS

281.655

;

Every three (3) years, for taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC, household goods, charter bus, and bus certificates, obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check in compliance with KRS

281.6301

, of each owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent operating a passenger vehicle or entering a private residence or storage facility for the purpose of providing or facilitating the transportation of household goods. However, within the three (3) year period:

If a new owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent joins the certificate holder and performs the aforementioned duties; or

If the certificate holder has knowledge that a current owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent who performs the aforementioned duties has been convicted of or pled guilty to any of the offenses listed in KRS

281.6301

(2);

then the certificate holder shall obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check for that owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent; and

For household goods certificates, have on file with the department a current tariff.

A motor carrier operating under a household goods certificate shall, at all times the certificate is in effect, maintain on file with the department a current tariff.

Except for a household goods certificate holder that has had only an out-of-state address on file with the department prior to January 1, 2015, all certificate holders shall maintain on file with the department an address within the Commonwealth. The certificate holder shall keep open for public inspection at that address such information as the department may require.

The certificate holder shall not charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater, less, or different compensation for the transportation of household goods or for any service in connection therewith, than the tariff filed with the department and in effect at the time would require. A certificate holder shall not make or give any unreasonable preference or advantage to any person, or subject any person to any unreasonable discrimination.

A certificate shall not be transferred unless the transfer involves either the change of the legal name of the existing certificate holder or the incorporation of a sole proprietor certificate holder.

A certificate authorizing a person to act as an automobile utility trailer lessor shall also authorize the agents of the person to act on his or her behalf during the period of their agency.

A motor carrier vehicle shall not be operated after the expiration of the certificate under which it is operated.

A person shall not knowingly employ the services of a motor carrier not authorized to perform such services.

If the department, after a hearing held upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds any existing rate unjustly discriminatory, or finds the services rendered or facilities employed by any motor carrier to be unsafe, inadequate, inconvenient, or in violation of law or of the administrative regulations of the department, it may by final order do any or all of the following:

Require the certificate holder to follow any rate or time schedule in effect at the time of service;

Require the certificate holder to issue a refund to the complainant;

Require the certificate holder to pay the fine set out in KRS

281.990

to the department; and

Determine the reasonable, safe, adequate, and convenient service to be thereafter furnished.

Hearings conducted under authority of this section shall be conducted in the same manner as provided in KRS

281.640

.

The department shall have the power to promulgate administrative regulations as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 13; 1952, ch. 21, § 1; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 1; 1958, ch. 130, § 11; 1960, ch. 139, § 6; 1972, ch. 274, § 157; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 174, § 7, effective July 1, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 196, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 19, § 10, effective June 24, 2015.

281.630.
Certificates issued by department — Applications — Fees — Renewal — Information to be filed — Agents of utility trailer lessor — Prohibition against employing services of unauthorized motor carrier — Powers of department relating to rates, services, and facilities — Hearings — Administrative regulations. [Effective January 1, 2023]

A person shall not act as a motor carrier without first obtaining a certificate from the department.

A certificate for the intrastate transportation of passengers or property, including household goods, shall be issued to any qualified applicant authorizing operation covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant conforms to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements of the administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with this section.

The department shall issue the following certificates:

Taxicab certificate;

Limousine certificate;

Disabled persons vehicle certificate;

Transportation network company certificate;

Household goods certificate;

Charter bus certificate;

Bus certificate;

U-Drive-It certificate;

Property certificate;

Driveaway certificate;

Peer-to-peer car sharing certificate; and

Automobile utility trailer certificate.

Application for a certificate shall be made in such form as the department may require. The department shall receive an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for all applications, except that the department shall receive an application fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for a property certificate.

Before the department may issue a certificate, an applicant shall:

Pay the application fee established under paragraph (b) of this subsection;

For entities other than TNCs and peer-to-peer car sharing companies, file a motor carrier vehicle license application for each motor carrier vehicle as required by KRS

281.631

. The applicant shall file at least one (1) motor carrier vehicle license application before being eligible for a certificate;

For TNCs, file a TNC authority application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

For peer-to-peer car sharing companies, file a peer-to-peer car sharing certificate application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

File with the department one (1) or more approved indemnifying bonds or insurance policies as required by KRS

281.655

;

For taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC, household goods, charter bus, and bus certificates, obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check, in compliance with KRS

281.6301

, of each owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent operating a passenger vehicle or household goods vehicle or entering a private residence or storage facility for the purpose of providing or facilitating the transportation of household goods;

For household goods certificates, file with the department a current tariff; and

For a bus certificate, file with the department authorization from a city as required by KRS

281.635

.

Every certificate shall be renewed annually. Application for renewal shall be in such form as the department may require.

A certificate not renewed within one (1) calendar year after the date for its renewal shall become null and void.

The department shall not renew any certificate if it has been revoked or, if suspended, during the period of any suspension. A certificate shall not be considered revoked or suspended when an appeal of the revocation or suspension is pending in a court of competent jurisdiction.

For the renewal of an intrastate certificate, the department shall receive a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), except for an application for renewal of a property certificate, for which the department shall receive a fee of twenty- five dollars ($25).

Before the department may renew a certificate, the certificate holder shall:

Pay the renewal fee established under paragraph (d) of this subsection;

For the entities other than TNCs and peer-to-peer car sharing companies, file a motor carrier vehicle license application or renewal for each motor carrier vehicle as required by KRS

281.631

. The certificate holder shall file at least one (1) motor carrier vehicle license application or renewal before being eligible for renewal;

For TNCs, file a TNC authority application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

For peer-to-peer car sharing companies, file a peer-to-peer car sharing certificate application with the department pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

File with the department one (1) or more approved indemnifying bonds or insurance policies as required by KRS

281.655

;

Every three (3) years, for taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC, household goods, charter bus, and bus certificates, obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check in compliance with KRS

281.6301

, of each owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent operating a passenger vehicle or entering a private residence or storage facility for the purpose of providing or facilitating the transportation of household goods. However, within the three (3) year period:

If a new owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent joins the certificate holder and performs the aforementioned duties; or

If the certificate holder has knowledge that a current owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent who performs the aforementioned duties has been convicted of or pled guilty to any of the offenses listed in KRS

281.6301

(2);

then the certificate holder shall obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, a nationwide criminal background check for that owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent; and

For household goods certificates, have on file with the department a current tariff.

A motor carrier operating under a household goods certificate shall, at all times the certificate is in effect, maintain on file with the department a current tariff.

Except for a household goods certificate holder that has had only an out-of-state address on file with the department prior to January 1, 2015, all certificate holders shall maintain on file with the department an address within the Commonwealth. The certificate holder shall keep open for public inspection at that address such information as the department may require.

The certificate holder shall not charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater, less, or different compensation for the transportation of household goods or for any service in connection therewith, than the tariff filed with the department and in effect at the time would require. A certificate holder shall not make or give any unreasonable preference or advantage to any person, or subject any person to any unreasonable discrimination.

A certificate shall not be transferred unless the transfer involves either the change of the legal name of the existing certificate holder or the incorporation of a sole proprietor certificate holder.

A certificate authorizing a person to act as an automobile utility trailer lessor shall also authorize the agents of the person to act on his or her behalf during the period of their agency.

A motor carrier vehicle shall not be operated after the expiration of the certificate under which it is operated.

A person shall not knowingly employ the services of a motor carrier not authorized to perform such services.

If the department, after a hearing held upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds any existing rate unjustly discriminatory, or finds the services rendered or facilities employed by any motor carrier to be unsafe, inadequate, inconvenient, or in violation of law or of the administrative regulations of the department, it may by final order do any or all of the following:

Require the certificate holder to follow any rate or time schedule in effect at the time of service;

Require the certificate holder to issue a refund to the complainant;

Require the certificate holder to pay the fine set out in KRS

281.990

to the department; and

Determine the reasonable, safe, adequate, and convenient service to be thereafter furnished.

Hearings conducted under authority of this section shall be conducted in the same manner as provided in KRS

281.640

.

The department shall have the power to promulgate administrative regulations as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 13; 1952, ch. 21, § 1; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 1; 1958, ch. 130, § 11; 1960, ch. 139, § 6; 1972, ch. 274, § 157; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 174, § 7, effective July 1, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 196, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 21, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 19, § 10, effective June 24, 2015; 2022 ch. 212, § 10, effective January 1, 2023.

281.6301.
Criminal background checks — Prohibition against engaging, permitting, or employing persons convicted of certain offenses — Administrative regulations.

A person granted a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, transportation network company, household goods, charter bus, or bus certificate shall obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years a nationwide criminal background check of each certificate holder, owner, official, employee, independent contractor, or agent operating a passenger or household goods vehicle, or whose duties may require in person contact with the public or entry into a private residence or storage facility for the purpose of providing or facilitating the transportation of household goods.

A certificate holder shall not engage, permit, or employ any person, including the certificate holder, to perform any of the duties outlined in subsection (1) of this section if that person has been convicted of any of the following offenses:

A Class A felony;

A Class B felony; or

A sex crime as defined in KRS

17.500

.

A certificate holder shall not engage, permit, or employ any person, including the certificate holder, to operate a motor carrier vehicle if that person has been convicted of any of the following offenses:

Leaving the scene of a traffic accident;

Causing a fatality or fatalities through negligent operation of a vehicle; or

Using a vehicle in the commission of a felony involving the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance.

A certificate holder shall not engage, permit, or employ any person, including the certificate holder, to operate a motor carrier vehicle if that person has been convicted of any of the following offenses in the past three (3) years:

Operating a motor vehicle on a suspended license in violation of KRS 186.620(2);

Operating a motor vehicle twenty-six (26) miles per hour or more in excess of the speed limit in violation of KRS

189.390

; or

Racing.

A certificate holder shall not engage, permit, or employ any person, including the certificate holder, to operate a motor carrier vehicle if that person has four (4) convictions in the past three (3) years for operating a motor vehicle in excess of the speed limit in violation of KRS

189.390

or for any offense which requires the assessment of penalty points by the department.

Criminal background checks under this section shall be:

Performed at the expense of the certificate holder;

Completed prior to the employment of or contracting with an applicant; and

Completed using an entity from an approved list issued by the department.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 21, § 6, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 19, § 11, effective June 24, 2015.

281.631.
Motor carrier vehicle license — Applications — Fees — Bulk application fees — Requirements for license — City and county license fees — Exemption for nonresident motor carriers — Partial fees for additional carriers — Administrative regulations.

No person shall act as a motor carrier without first obtaining a motor carrier vehicle license from the department for each motor carrier vehicle.

Application for and renewal of a motor carrier vehicle license shall be made in such form as the department may require. Every motor carrier vehicle license shall be renewed annually.

Except as permitted under paragraph (b) of this subsection, an applicant or license holder shall pay to the department the following annual license fees:

Thirty dollars ($30) for each taxicab, limousine, TNC, or disabled persons vehicle;

Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle transporting household goods for hire;

One hundred dollars ($100) for each charter bus or bus;

Fifteen dollars ($15) for each motor carrier vehicle operating as a U-Drive-It;

Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle transporting property other than household goods and those exempt under KRS

281.605

;

Ten dollars ($10) for each motor carrier vehicle operating as a driveaway; and

Ten dollars ($10) for each automobile utility trailer.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to set forth an optional motor carrier vehicle license fee schedule under this subsection on a bulk basis for applicants who employ or contract with more than fifty (50) vehicles. Bulk application fees under these administrative regulations may use a tiered system based on the type of certificate and the number of vehicles.

Before the department may issue or renew a motor carrier vehicle license, the applicant or license holder shall:

Pay the fee established under subsection (3) of this section;

For a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC vehicle, charter bus, and bus, provide a copy of the vehicle registration for each out-of-state registered motor carrier vehicle being licensed, and if necessary, a statement showing that the driver is an insured driver of the vehicle, and that the registered owner or lessee authorizes the use of the vehicle for TNC services; and

For a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, TNC vehicle, charter bus, and bus, obtain and retain for a period of at least three (3) years, an inspection of the motor vehicle in the manner and form as the department may require.

No motor carrier vehicle shall be operated after the expiration of the motor carrier vehicle license under which it is operated.

All cities or counties of the Commonwealth may impose an annual license fee on an intrastate taxicab, limousine, or disabled persons vehicle operated from said city or county. The annual license fee shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per vehicle.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, nonresident motor carriers engaged in transporting passengers for hire in irregular route interstate charter or special operations shall be exempt from all fees prescribed in this chapter, if reciprocal privileges are granted to similar nonresident carriers by the laws and regulations of his or her state.

If any person required to pay a license fee under subsection (3) of this section begins the operation of an additional motor carrier vehicle after the date of its certificate or renewal, the fee shall be as many twelfths of the annual fee as there are unexpired months in the certificate or renewal year.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations as it deems necessary to carry out.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 212, §§ 1, 2; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 2; 1998, ch. 331, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 19, § 12, effective June 24, 2015.

281.632.
Temporary authority for service — Renewal of temporary authority period. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.633.
Personal representative’s power over decedent’s certificate — Transferring certificate when holder incorporates. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 139, § 13; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.634.
Payment of ad valorem tax as condition to issuance of certificate or permit. [Repealed.]

281.635.
Cities may authorize operation of buses — Certificates — City’s authority over buses — Appeal — Concurrent power of certain local governments over certified carriers — Exemption for human service transportation delivery vehicles.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter:

All cities of the Commonwealth are vested with the power to grant authorization for the operation of buses over their streets and highways. Upon acquiring authorization, the holder of the authorization shall apply to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for a bus certificate.

The governing body of any city in the Commonwealth in which city buses operate shall have supervisory and regulatory power over such buses, while operating in the city, and shall have authority to enforce all ordinances or regulations pertaining to routes, services, time schedules, and operation of the buses and the drivers thereof, but any interested party may appeal to the department from any action, finding, or order of any city within thirty (30) days after the entry of the action, finding, or order, and a hearing shall be held in accordance with KRS

281.640

; however, any action, finding, or order of any city shall be sustained if there is substantial evidence or reason to support it; otherwise the department shall make the orders as it deems necessary and proper. However, where a carrier’s entire operation is confined to intracity transportation within the corporate limits of a single city, there shall be no appeal to the department from the actions, findings, or orders of the city. Provided further, that where any city bus is subject to the regulatory powers of more than one (1) city and the regulations are in conflict or such as to impede the transportation facilities serving the cities, or the carrier is failing to furnish safe, adequate and convenient service to the public, the department may, upon complaint or on its own initiative, call a hearing and enter orders as are necessary and proper.

The governing body of any city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, and the city’s suburban area, or the corporate limits of any city and its suburban area located in a county which contains a city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, or an urban-county government, in the Commonwealth in which taxicabs, limousines, or disabled persons vehicles operate shall have concurrent supervisory and regulatory power over those certified carriers operating from the city, and shall have authority to enforce all ordinances or regulations pertaining to their operation, but any interested party may appeal to the department from any action, finding, or order of any city within thirty (30) days after the entry of the action, finding, or order, and a hearing shall be held in accordance with KRS

281.640

; however, any action, finding, or order of any city shall be sustained if there is substantial evidence or reason to support it; otherwise, the department shall make any orders that it deems necessary and proper. Where any taxicab, limousine, or disabled persons vehicle carrier is subject to the regulatory powers of more than one (1) city and the regulations of those cities are in conflict or impede serving the transportation needs of the Commonwealth, the department may, upon complaint or on its own initiative, call a hearing and enter orders as are necessary and proper, including establishing or requiring the establishment of uniform regulations.

The governing body of any city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, and the city’s suburban area, or the corporate limits of any city and its suburban area located in a county which contains a city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, or an urban-county government, in the Commonwealth is hereby vested with the concurrent power to prescribe the qualifications with respect to the health, vision, sobriety, intelligence, ability, moral character, and experience of the drivers of taxicabs, limousines, or disabled persons vehicles operating from the city, and while operating in the city, and may issue permits for qualified drivers. However, any taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, or TNC vehicle driver must also possess a valid operator’s license from Kentucky or another jurisdiction.

The governing body of a city shall not have authority over a motor vehicle that is being operated as a human service transportation delivery vehicle under a contract with the Transportation Cabinet in accordance with KRS 96A.095(4).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1974, ch. 307, § 1; 1978, ch. 232, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 197, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 607, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 92, § 285, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 19, § 13, effective June 24, 2015.

281.637.
Charter bus certificate. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 198, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.640.
Conduct of hearings — Suspension and revocation of certificates and licenses — Final order — Renewal of certificate does not preclude subsequent proceedings — Appeal.

Hearings before the department shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.

After a hearing held upon the department’s motion or upon complaint, in addition to the remedies outlined in KRS 281.630(10), the department may suspend or revoke any certificate or license issued to a motor carrier if the department is satisfied the motor carrier or the motor carrier’s drivers, other agents, or motor carrier vehicles:

Violate the provisions of this chapter;

Violate an order or administrative regulation promulgated by the department;

Violate the laws of this state; or

Are found to be unfit to carry out the duties, obligations, and responsibilities of a motor carrier.

The commissioner or one (1) of the assistant commissioners with approval by the commissioner, shall have authority to issue a final order of the department. The recommended order shall not become the final order of the department through failure to file exceptions, but in the absence of exceptions ordinarily will be taken by the department as the basis of its final order.

The department shall have the right to withdraw, set aside, or amend any final order it has issued, except that such action upon the part of the department shall be taken between the date of the rendition of the final order and the expiration of the time for appeal or until an appeal has been taken.

The renewal by the department of the certificate of a motor carrier shall not be construed to be a waiver of any violation that occurred prior to the renewal and shall not prevent subsequent proceedings against the motor carrier.

An appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court may be taken from any final order of the department by anyone who was a party to the proceedings before it by filing a petition of appeal with the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. In the case of an appeal in which a certificate has been revoked or suspended, the certificate shall remain in force until final disposition of the appeal.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 15; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 3; 1962, ch. 63, § 4; 1996, ch. 318, § 199, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 19, § 14, effective June 24, 2015.

281.641.
Department may withdraw, set aside or amend final order — Time. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 8; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.645.
New application after denial of previous application. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 16; 1954, ch. 188, § 5; 1960, ch. 90, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.650.
Renewal of certificate or permit. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 17; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 4; 1988, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 174, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 21, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.